Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3701
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-3701 to 43-3718 shall be known and may be cited as the Court Appointed Special Advocate Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 24;

Laws 2011, LB463, § 18;

Laws 2026, LB952, § 4.
July 1, 2026